Utah statutes.
63C-13-104.3.   Authority duties and responsibilities.

(1)  The authority shall:

(a)  consult with the division in formulating a request for proposals under Subsection (1)(b);

(b)  with the approval of the director of the division and the written approval of the governor, and in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 6a, Utah Procurement Code, issue a request for proposals inviting persons to submit proposals on a new prison development project, current prison land development project, or master development project;

(c)  provide a process for persons to submit proposals and for the authority to receive proposals;

(d)  hold at least one public hearing in the municipality within which the current prison is located to receive public comment on proposals on a current prison land development project;

(e)  hold at least one public hearing in each location where a new prison is proposed to be located under proposals on a new prison development project;

(f)  evaluate the proposals that are submitted;

(g)  in evaluating and making a decision on proposals, give additional weight to a proposal that contemplates using contractors, material providers, and laborers from within the state;

(h)  decide whether to recommend that one of the proposals or a combination of proposals for a new prison development project, current prison land development project, or master development project be accepted and that a contract be awarded to the person or persons who submitted the proposal or combination of proposals; and

(i)  if the authority decides to recommend a proposal or combination of proposals for awarding a contract for a new prison development project, current prison land development project, or master development project to the person or persons who submitted the proposal or combination of proposals, submit its written recommendation to the governor and the Legislative Management Committee.

(2)  The authority may appoint one or more subcommittees of its members to act on matters within the authority's duties and responsibilities, but any action of a subcommittee is subject to the authority's approval.



Enacted by Chapter 228, 2013 General Session

